Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Asbestos Health Hazard Abatement Program.

Collateral references. —

Breach of assumed duty to inspect property as ground for liability to third party. 13 ALR5th 289.

Sec. 18.31.010.
Program established.

The asbestos health hazard abatement program is established in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development to coordinate efforts of state departments and agencies to abate asbestos health hazards in schools in the state.
The program applies to all work in public schools and the University of Alaska involving

demolition, removal, encapsulation, salvage, repair, transportation, disposal, storage, and containment of asbestos products;

construction, alteration, repair, maintenance, or renovation that will cause asbestos fibers to become airborne.

History.

(§ 2 ch 71 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.28.010

.
Renumbered in 1985.

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.31.020.
Duties of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

In order to abate asbestos health hazards from public schools and from the University of Alaska, the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall

in a school district or regional educational attendance area that has not complied with Environmental Protection Agency asbestos regulations (40 C.F.R. Part 763), inspect school buildings to determine the presence of asbestos, take samples as needed, answer inquiries on the subject, ensure quality control of asbestos sampling, or enter into contracts for these purposes;

distribute, retrieve, and store training materials concerning inspection and sampling for asbestos;

establish guidelines, in conformity with Environmental Protection Agency asbestos regulations (40 C.F.R. Part 763), for abating asbestos health hazards, for inspecting and collecting samples of suspected asbestos, and for analyzing the samples;

evaluate analysis results and distribute the results to affected schools;

coordinate efforts by state departments and agencies and by school officials to identify and abate asbestos health hazards;

cooperate with the Department of Education and Early Development to administer state money appropriated for the asbestos health hazard abatement program;

establish classifications of asbestos health hazards according to the severity of the hazard and determine on the basis of those classifications the order in which abatement projects should proceed;

review and approve all asbestos health hazard abatement projects relating to respirator use and employee training, including training materials;

oversee an employee certification program;

establish guidelines and procedures to prevent damage to asbestos products in daily operations;

whenever the department is informed of scheduled work to abate an asbestos health hazard, inform the contractors and other concerned persons of the health hazards of asbestos;

assist the University of Alaska in its efforts to abate asbestos health hazards; and

adopt regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 71 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.28.020

.
Renumbered in 1985.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999, and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For asbestos abatement certification, see 8 AAC 61, art. 8.

Sec. 18.31.030.
Duties of the Department of Education and Early Development.

To assist in implementing the asbestos health hazard abatement program, the Department of Education and Early Development shall

cooperate with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, school districts, and regional educational attendance areas to ensure inspection of public schools for asbestos health hazards and to ensure that identified asbestos health hazards are abated;

maintain records, files, and reports on asbestos health hazards in public schools;

administer state money appropriated to finance renovation contracts under AS

18.31.040

(5);

in accordance with priorities established by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development under AS

18.31.020

(7), distribute grants to school districts and regional educational attendance areas for the abatement of health hazards in public schools; and

inform the Department of Labor and Workforce Development when renovation contracts are awarded under AS

18.31.040

(5), to enable the Department of Labor and Workforce Development to advise contractors and other concerned persons of the health hazards of asbestos that may be encountered in the renovation project.

History.

(§ 2 ch 71 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.28.030

.
Renumbered in 1985.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999, and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with §§ 89 - 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.31.040.
Duties of school officials.

To assist in implementing the asbestos health hazard abatement program, each city or borough school district and each regional educational attendance area shall

maintain records of all inspections, including sample dates, location, condition, and analysis of materials;

notify school personnel of the location of asbestos materials and ways to reduce exposure;

notify the parents of students about the results of asbestos inspections in their children’s schools;

either

contract for the inspection of its school buildings in compliance with Environmental Protection Agency asbestos regulations (40 C.F.R. Part 763) and in accordance with guidelines established by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development and under the supervision of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development; or

notify the Department of Labor and Workforce Development that the school district or regional educational attendance area has not entered and does not intend to enter into a contract for an inspection for asbestos health hazards; and

contract for renovating school buildings to abate asbestos health hazards, and supervise and monitor the renovation contracts, applying the standards in AS

18.60.075

to protect the health of persons who renovate the school buildings.

History.

(§ 2 ch 71 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.28.040

.
Renumbered in 1985.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.31.050.
Repayment of grant funds.

A school district or regional educational attendance area that receives a state grant for the abatement of asbestos health hazards in schools shall repay the grant from any money the district or the regional educational attendance area recovers from asbestos manufacturers or other parties in a claim for damages arising from the use of asbestos in a school. Repayment shall be made after deducting legal fees and other costs associated with the claim for damages.

History.

(§ 2 ch 71 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

18.28.050

.
Renumbered in 1985.